test/src/morphology/V-jello_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - je’llõ: # Verb 'to live' - full paradigm
     je’llõ+V+IV+Inf: je’llõ
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jelāb
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jelād
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jelāb
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: je’llõm
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: je’llõt
     je’llõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: je’llõbõd
